Florida, session 2026, SB230.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âPresent subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 30 624.4213, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2), 31 (3), and (4), respectively, a new subsection (1) and subsections 32 (5) through (8) are added to that section, and present 33 subsection (1) of that section is amended, to read: 34 624.4213âTrade secret documents.â 35 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âtrade secretâ has 36 the same meaning as provided in s. 688.002. 37 (2)(1)âIf any person who is required to submit documents or 38 other information to the office or department pursuant to the 39 insurance code or by rule or order of the office, department, or 40 commission claims that such submission contains a trade secret, 41 such person may file with the office or department a notice of 42 trade secret as provided in this section. Failure to do so 43 constitutes a waiver of any claim by such person that the 44 document or information is a trade secret. 45 (a)âEach page of such document or specific portion of a 46 document claimed to be a trade secret must be clearly marked as 47 âtrade secret.â 48 (b)âAll material marked as a trade secret must be separated 49 from all non-trade secret material, such as being submitted in a 50 separate envelope clearly marked as âtrade secret.â 51 (c)âIn submitting a notice of trade secret to the office or 52 department, the submitting party must include a sworn an 53 affidavit that includes all certifying under oath to the truth 54 of the following statements concerning all documents or 55 information that are claimed to be trade secrets: 56 1.âThe basis for the claim that the submission qualifies as 57 a trade secret. 58 2.âA statement that all of the following are true: 59 a.1.â...(I consider/My company considers)... this 60 information a trade secret that has value and provides an 61 advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over those 62 who do not know or use it. 63 b.2.â...(I have/My company has)... taken measures to 64 prevent the disclosure of the information to anyone other than 65 those who have been selected to have access for limited 66 purposes, and ...(I intend/my company intends)... to continue to 67 take such measures. 68 c.3.âThe information is not, and has not been, reasonably 69 obtainable without ...(my/our)... consent by other persons by 70 use of legitimate means. 71 d.4.âThe information is not publicly available elsewhere, 72 and the public release of such information would cause actual, 73 demonstrable harm to ...(me/my company).... 74 3.âA summary prepared for the general public which 75 describes the nature of the submission claimed to be a trade 76 secret without disclosing the protected details of the 77 submission. 78 (5)âThe following information is not considered a trade 79 secret and is subject to public disclosure: 80 (a)âAny financial information, including data, models, or 81 assumptions, used in the calculation or justification of 82 insurance rates. 83 (b)âAll transactions between an insurer and any affiliate, 84 including, but not limited to, fees, commissions, payments, or 85 profit-sharing agreements with managing general agents, as 86 defined in s. 626.015, claims handlers, reinsurers, or third 87 party administrators. 88 (c)âOfficer and employee compensation. 89 (d)âDividends paid to shareholders. 90 (e)âAny information contained in rate filings. 91 (f)âAny information used to support or oppose proposed 92 legislation. 93 (g)âThe summary prepared in accordance with subparagraph 94 (2)(c)3. 95 (6)âThe office shall review all claims of trade secret 96 protection submitted under this section. If the office or 97 department determines that the information does not meet the 98 definition of a trade secret under s. 688.002 or falls within 99 the categories described in subsection (5), the claim must be 100 denied and the office must issue a written notice of denial to 101 the submitting party. 102 (7)âThe commission shall, at least once every other year, 103 contract with an independent third-party entity with expertise 104 in insurance regulation to conduct an independent review of 105 trade secret claims submitted under this section. The contract 106 must require submission of a final report to the commission, the 107 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 108 Representatives by February 1 following the year in which a 109 review is conducted which identifies any trade secret claim the 110 third-party entity recommends be rejected by the commission. 111 (8)âA person who knowingly asserts a false claim of trade 112 secret protection in order to conceal unlawful financial 113 practices is subject to an administrative fine imposed by the 114 office in an amount not to exceed $25,000 per violation. In 115 addition, the office may suspend or revoke the personâs 116 certificate of authority or license as provided in s. 624.418. 117 Section 2.âSection 624.4214, Florida Statutes, is created 118 to read: 119 624.4214âPublic disclosure of affiliate financial 120 arrangement.âAll fees, commissions, and profit-sharing 121 agreements between an insurer and its affiliates must be filed 122 with the office and made publicly accessible on the departmentâs 123 website. 124 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.